Maryland, session 2025, HB1016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
SUBTITLE 12. BALTIMORE CONVENTION AND TOURISM REDEVELOPMENT AND
OPERATING AUTHORITY.
12–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AUTHORITY” MEANS THE BALTIMORE CONVENTION AND TOURISM
REDEVELOPMENT AND OPERATING AUTHORITY.
(C) “BALTIMORE CONVENTION SITE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
10–601 OF THIS ARTICLE.
12–1202.
(A) THERE IS A BALTIMORE CONVENTION AND TOURISM REDEVELOPMENT
AND OPERATING AUTHORITY.
(B) THE AUTHORITY IS A BODY POLITIC AND CORPORATE AND IS AN
INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE STATE.
(C) THE EXERCISE BY THE AUTHORITY OF A POWER UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
IS THE PERFORMANCE OF AN ESSENTIAL GOVERNMENTAL FUNCTION.
12–1203.
(A) THE AUTHORITY CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) ONE MEMBER, APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE,
WHO IS NOT AN ELECTED OFFICIAL AND IS A RESIDENT OF OR REPRESENTS A
BUSINESS THAT OPERATES IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, BALTIMORE CITY,
BALTIMORE COUNTY, OR HOWARD COUNTY;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 214
(2) ONE MEMBER, APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE, WHO
IS NOT AN ELECTED OFFICIAL AND IS A RESIDENT OF OR REPRESENTS A BUSINESS
THAT OPERATES IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, BALTIMORE CITY, BALTIMORE
COUNTY, OR HOWARD COUNTY;
(3) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE RESTAURANT INDUSTRY IN
BALTIMORE CITY, APPOINTED BY THE RESTAURANT ASSOCIATION OF MARYLAND;
(4) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE HOTEL INDUSTRY IN BALTIMORE
CITY, APPOINTED BY THE MARYLAND HOTEL LODGING ASSOCIATION;
(5) NINE MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE MAYOR OF BALTIMORE CITY,
FROM THE CENTRAL BUSINESS DISTRICT OF BALTIMORE CITY, AS DEFINED BY THE
ZONING CODE OF BALTIMORE CITY, OF WHOM:
(I) ONE SHALL BE AN ATTORNEY;
(II) ONE SHALL HAVE EXPERIENCE IN THE FINANCIAL SERVICES
INDUSTRY;
(III) ONE SHALL BE A REPRESENTATIVE OF A PROFESSIONAL
MAJOR LEAGUE BASEBALL FRANCHISE THAT IS A LESSEE OF A STADIUM IN
BALTIMORE CITY, OR A PROFESSIONAL FOOTBALL (NFL) FRANCHISE THAT IS A
LESSEE OF A STADIUM IN BALTIMORE CITY; AND
(IV) ONE SHALL HAVE EXPERIENCE IN REAL ESTATE
DEVELOPMENT; AND
(6) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR WITH
THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE:
(I) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A BUSINESS THAT OPERATES IN
ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, BALTIMORE CITY, BALTIMORE COUNTY, OR HOWARD
COUNTY; AND
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ORGANIZED LABOR GROUP
ASSOCIATED WITH THE BALTIMORE CONVENTION SITE OR THE TOURISM INDUSTRY
IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, BALTIMORE CITY, BALTIMORE COUNTY, OR HOWARD
COUNTY.
(B) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER OF THE AUTHORITY IS 4 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF THE MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY
THE TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS ON JULY 1, 2025.
– 3 –

Ch. 214 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER OF THE AUTHORITY
CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(C) THE MAYOR OF BALTIMORE CITY SHALL DESIGNATE A CHAIR OF THE
AUTHORITY FROM AMONG THE MEMBERS APPOINTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (A)(5) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) A MEMBER OF THE AUTHORITY MAY BE REMOVED FOR INCOMPETENCE,
MISCONDUCT, OR FAILURE TO PERFORM THE DUTIES OF THE POSITION BY:
(1) THE GOVERNOR, IF APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(2) THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE, IF APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT;
(3) THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE, IF APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER;
(4) THE APPOINTING ASSOCIATION, IF APPOINTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (A)(3) OR (4) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(5) THE MAYOR OF BALTIMORE CITY, IF APPOINTED BY THE MAYOR.
12–1204.
(A) THE AUTHORITY SHALL DETERMINE THE TIMES AND PLACES OF ITS
MEETINGS.
(B) (1) NINE MEMBERS OF THE AUTHORITY ARE A QUORUM.
(2) ACTION BY THE AUTHORITY REQUIRES THE AFFIRMATIVE VOTE
OF AT LEAST NINE MEMBERS OF THE AUTHORITY.
(C) A MEMBER OF THE AUTHORITY:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
AUTHORITY; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 214
12–1205.
THE AUTHORITY MAY EMPLOY OR RETAIN, EITHER AS EMPLOYEES OR AS
INDEPENDENT CONTRACTORS, CONSULTANTS, ENGINEERS, ARCHITECTS,
ACCOUNTANTS, ATTORNEYS, FINANCIAL EXPERTS, CONSTRUCTION EXPERTS AND
PERSONNEL, SUPERINTENDENTS, MANAGERS AND OTHER PROFESSIONAL
PERSONNEL, PERSONNEL, AND AGENTS AS THE AUTHORITY CONSIDERS
NECESSARY, AND SET THEIR COMPENSATION.
12–1206.
THE AUTHORITY SHALL:
(1) DETERMINE THE CHARACTER OF ANY RENOVATION,
REVITALIZATION, OR DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS RELATING TO THE BALTIMORE
CONVENTION SITE;
(2) ENTER INTO ANY AGREEMENTS, LEASES, PARTNERSHIPS, OR
CONTRACTS NECESSARY TO RENOVATE, REVITALIZE, MAINTAIN, AND MANAGE THE
BALTIMORE CONVENTION SITE, AUTHORITY–OWNED REAL PROPERTY ASSETS, AND
ANY OTHER CONTIGUOUS OR NEARBY REAL PROPERTY ASSET THAT THE AUTHORITY
IDENTIFIES AND OVER WHICH THE AUTHORITY OBTAINS SITE CONTROL;
(3) ANALYZE AND PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE MAYOR AND
CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY, THE GOVERNOR, AND THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY REGARDING THE SUSTAINABILITY, RENOVATION, AND MODERNIZATION
OF AND FUNDING STREAMS TO RENOVATE, REVITALIZE, OR DEVELOP THE
BALTIMORE CONVENTION SITE, AUTHORITY–OWNED REAL PROPERTY ASSETS, AND
ANY OTHER CONTIGUOUS OR NEARBY REAL PROPERTY ASSET THAT THE AUTHORITY
IDENTIFIES AND OVER WHICH THE AUTHORITY OBTAINS SITE CONTROL;
(4) FIX AND COLLECT RATES, RENTALS, FEES, AND CHARGES FOR
SERVICES REQUIRED TO SUCCESSFULLY OPERATE, MAINTAIN, AND MANAGE THE
BALTIMORE CONVENTION SITE OR ANY OTHER AUTHORITY–OWNED OR
CONTROLLED REAL PROPERTY ASSETS;
(5) ESTABLISH RULES AND REGULATIONS FOR THE USE OF THE
BALTIMORE CONVENTION SITE OR ANY OTHER AUTHORITY–OWNED OR
CONTROLLED REAL PROPERTY ASSETS;
(6) ADOPT BYLAWS FOR THE CONDUCT OF THE AUTHORITY’S
BUSINESS, INCLUDING A PROCESS TO APPOINT AN ADVISORY BOARD TO THE
AUTHORITY;
– 5 –

Ch. 214 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(7) GOVERN THE STRATEGIC AND CAPITAL PLANNING AND RESOURCE
ALLOCATION OF THE DESTINATION MARKETING ORGANIZATION FOR BALTIMORE
CITY, VISIT BALTIMORE, TO ENSURE THE ABILITY OF THE ORGANIZATION TO
SUCCESSFULLY MARKET BALTIMORE CITY AS A TOURISM DESTINATION WITH A
SPECIFIC EMPHASIS ON MEETINGS AND CONVENTIONS; AND
(8) MAKE ANY OTHER RECOMMENDATIONS THE AUTHORITY DEEMS
NECESSARY.
12–1207.
THE AUTHORITY MAY:
(1) ADOPT A SEAL;
(2) MAINTAIN OFFICES AT A PLACE THE AUTHORITY DESIGNATES IN
THE STATE;
(3) ACCEPT LOANS, GRANTS, OR ASSISTANCE OF ANY KIND FROM THE
FEDERAL OR STATE GOVERNMENT, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A COLLEGE OR
UNIVERSITY, OR A PRIVATE SOURCE;
(4) ENTER INTO CONTRACTS AND OTHER LEGAL INSTRUMENTS;
(5) RETAIN, EMPLOY, OR HIRE AN INDEPENDENT FIRM FOR THE
PURPOSES OF RENOVATING, REVITALIZING, MAINTAINING, AND MANAGING THE
BALTIMORE CONVENTION SITE, AUTHORITY–OWNED REAL PROPERTY ASSETS, AND
ANY OTHER CONTIGUOUS OR NEARBY REAL PROPERTY ASSET THAT THE AUTHORITY
IDENTIFIES AND OVER WHICH THE AUTHORITY OBTAINS SITE CONTROL;
(6) SUE OR BE SUED;
(7) ACQUIRE, PURCHASE, HOLD, LEASE AS LESSEE, AND USE ANY
REAL, PERSONAL, MIXED, TANGIBLE, OR INTANGIBLE PROPERTY;
(8) SELL, LEASE AS LESSOR, TRANSFER, LICENSE, ASSIGN, OR
DISPOSE OF PROPERTY OR A PROPERTY INTEREST THAT IT ACQUIRES;
(9) CHARGE FOR SERVICES AND RESOURCES THE AUTHORITY
PROVIDES OR MAKES AVAILABLE;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 214
(10) CREATE, OWN, CONTROL, OR BE A MEMBER OF A CORPORATION,
LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, PARTNERSHIP, OR OTHER ENTITY, WHETHER
OPERATED FOR PROFIT OR NOT FOR PROFIT;
(11) EXERCISE POWER USUALLY POSSESSED BY A PRIVATE
CORPORATION IN PERFORMING SIMILAR FUNCTIONS UNLESS TO DO SO WOULD
CONFLICT WITH STATE LAW; AND
(12) DO ALL THINGS NECESSARY AND CONVENIENT TO CARRY OUT THE
POWERS GRANTED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
12–1208.
(A) THE AUTHORITY IS EXEMPT:
(1) FROM TAXATION BY STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT;
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 4 AND TITLE 14,
SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, FROM DIVISION
II OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
(3) FROM § 15–112 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE; AND
(4) FROM THE PROVISIONS OF DIVISION I OF THE STATE PERSONNEL
AND PENSIONS ARTICLE THAT GOVERN THE STATE PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT
SYSTEM.
(B) (1) THE AUTHORITY IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT; AND
(II) THE OPEN MEETINGS ACT.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF THE OPEN MEETINGS ACT, A PROJECT SITE
VISIT OR EDUCATIONAL FIELD TOUR MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED A MEETING OF THE
AUTHORITY IF NO ORGANIZATIONAL BUSINESS IS CONDUCTED.
(C) THE MEMBERS OF THE AUTHORITY AND ITS EMPLOYEES ARE SUBJECT
TO THE PUBLIC ETHICS LAW.
12–1209.
– 7 –

Ch. 214 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) (1) AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE FISCAL
YEAR, AN INDEPENDENT CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANT SHALL AUDIT THE
FINANCIAL BOOKS, RECORDS, AND ACCOUNTS OF THE AUTHORITY.
(2) THE AUDIT SHALL INCLUDE REVENUE AND EXPENSE DETAIL FOR
EACH OF THE OPERATING FACILITIES OF THE AUTHORITY.
(3) THE AUTHORITY SHALL SELECT AN ACCOUNTANT TO CONDUCT
THE AUDIT WHO:
(I) IS LICENSED TO PRACTICE ACCOUNTANCY IN THE STATE;
(II) IS EXPERIENCED AND QUALIFIED IN THE ACCOUNTING AND
AUDITING OF PUBLIC ENTITIES; AND
(III) DOES NOT HAVE A DIRECT OR INDIRECT PERSONAL
INTEREST IN THE FISCAL AFFAIRS OF THE AUTHORITY.
(4) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1 AFTER EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE
ACCOUNTANT SHALL REPORT THE RESULTS OF THE AUDIT, INCLUDING THE
ACCOUNTANT’S UNQUALIFIED OPINION OF THE PRESENTATION OF THE FINANCIAL
POSITION OF THE FUNDS OF THE AUTHORITY, INDIVIDUAL FINANCIAL DETAIL FOR
EACH OF THE OPERATING FACILITIES OF THE AUTHORITY, AND THE RESULTS OF
THE FINANCIAL OPERATIONS OF THE AUTHORITY.
(II) IF THE ACCOUNTANT CANNOT EXPRESS AN UNQUALIFIED
OPINION, THE ACCOUNTANT SHALL EXPLAIN IN DETAIL THE REASONS FOR THE
QUALIFICATIONS, DISCLAIMERS, OR OPINIONS, INCLUDING RECOMMENDATIONS
FOR CHANGES THAT COULD MAKE FUTURE UNQUALIFIED OPINIONS POSSIBLE.
(B) THE STATE MAY AUDIT THE BOOKS, RECORDS, AND ACCOUNTS OF THE
AUTHORITY.
12–1210.
(A) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, AND EACH OCTOBER 1 THEREAFTER,
THE AUTHORITY SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR, THE MAYOR OF
BALTIMORE CITY, AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 214
(B) THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE A COMPLETE OPERATING AND FINANCIAL
STATEMENT AND SUMMARIZE THE ACTIVITIES OF THE AUTHORITY DURING THE
PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial
members of the Baltimore Convention and Tourism Redevelopment and Operating
Authority shall expire as follows:
(1) five members in 2027, including one member described under §
12–1203(a)(6) and one member described under § 12–1203(a)(3);
(2) five members in 2028, including one member described under §
12–1203(a)(1) and one member described under § 12–1203(a)(4); and
(3) five members in 2029, including one member described under §
12–1203(a)(6) and one member described under 12–1203(a)(2).
Chapter 635 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(g) The Task Force shall:
(1) study the establishment of an entity or strategy to govern and
redevelop, revitalize, construct, design, manage, finance, and operate certain State and
local real property assets while promoting the Baltimore Convention site and the
immediate surrounding area; [and]
(2) IDENTIFY FUNDING SOURCES AND MECHANISMS TO:
(I) RENOVATE, REVITALIZE, AND DEVELOP PROJECTS
RELATING TO THE BALTIMORE CONVENTION SITE AND THE IMMEDIATE
SURROUNDING AREA, EXCLUDING AREAS 13, 14, AND 15A AS DESIGNATED BY THE
CITY OF BALTIMORE INNER HARBOR PROJECT I URBAN RENEWAL PLAN; AND
(II) ESTABLISH AND SUSTAIN THE OPERATIONS OF A
BALTIMORE CONVENTION AND TOURISM REDEVELOPMENT AND OPERATING
AUTHORITY; AND
(3) make recommendations on:
(i) the membership of any recommended entity;
– 9 –

Ch. 214 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) the purpose and function of any recommended entity, including
its ability to:
1. acquire by purchase, gift, or devise any property,
franchises, and other interests in the Baltimore Convention site and any offices, parking
lots or garages, access roads, hotels, restaurants, railroad sidings, and other structures,
improvements, equipment, furnishings, or other property functionally related to and
located in the immediate surrounding area of the Baltimore Convention site, and take title
to the property in the name of the recommended entity or its designated agent;
2. determine the character of any renovation, revitalization,
or development projects relating to the Baltimore Convention site and the immediate
surrounding area, excluding Areas 13, 14, and 15A as designated by the City of Baltimore
Inner Harbor Project I Urban Renewal Plan;
3. enter into any agreements, leases, partnerships, or
contracts necessary to renovate, revitalize, maintain, and manage the Baltimore
Convention site or any other State or local real property assets identified by the Task Force;
4. fix and collect rates, rentals, fees, and charges for services
required to successfully operate the Baltimore Convention site or any other State or local
real property assets;
5. establish rules and regulations for the use of the Baltimore
Convention site or any other State or local real property assets; and
6. issue bonds for renovation, revitalization, and ongoing
maintenance and management of the Baltimore Convention site or any other State or local
real property assets identified by the Task Force, including operating expenses; [and]
(iii) THE FUNDING SOURCES AND MECHANISMS IDENTIFIED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(IV) any other matter the Task Force deems necessary for the
establishment and implementation of an effective entity or strategy.
(j) (1) On or before December 1, 2024, the Task Force shall report its findings
and recommendations to the Mayor of Baltimore City, the Governor, and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, THE TASK FORCE SHALL
REPORT ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS ON FUNDING SOURCES AND
MECHANISMS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (G)(3)(III) OF THIS SECTION
TO THE MAYOR OF BALTIMORE CITY, THE GOVERNOR, AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 214
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2024. It shall remain effective for a period of [1 year] 2 YEARS and, at the end of June
30, [2025] 2026, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall
be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July June 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 11 –